Illinois, session 104th, SB1306.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $7,500,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 6Student Assistance Commission Contracts and Grants Fund to the 7Illinois Student Assistance Commission for the Human Services 8Professional Loan Repayment Program. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.